Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.130

Ambulance services and aid services—Licensing.

An ambulance service or aid service may not operate in the state of Washington without holding a license for such operation, issued by the secretary when such operation is consistent with the statewide and regional emergency medical services and trauma care plans established pursuant to chapter 70.168 RCW, indicating the general area to be served and the number of vehicles to be used, with the following exceptions:

(1) The United States government;

(2) Ambulance services providing service in other states when bringing patients into this state;

(3) Owners of businesses in which ambulance or aid vehicles are used exclusively on company property but occasionally in emergencies may transport patients to hospitals not on company property;

(4) Operators of vehicles pressed into service for transportation of patients in emergencies when licensed ambulances are not available or cannot meet overwhelming demand; and

(5) Emergency services supervisory organizations, as defined in *RCW 18.73.030(13). All entities that employ certified emergency medical services personnel must ensure that such personnel work under the medical oversight and protocols of a medical program director and within their scope of practice, are able to meet certification training requirements, and are provided with necessary medical equipment to provide care at their level of certification.

The license shall be valid for a period of two years and shall be renewed on request provided the holder has consistently complied with the regulations of the department and the department of licensing and provided also that the needs of the area served have been met satisfactorily. The license shall not be transferable and may be revoked if the service is found in violation of rules adopted by the department.

[ 2021 c 69 s 2; 2000 c 93 s 18; 1992 c 128 s 2; 1990 c 269 s 25; 1987 c 214 s 10; 1979 ex.s. c 261 s 13; 1979 c 158 s 61; 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 13.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.73.030 was amended by 2022 c 136 s 1, changing subsection (13) to subsection (14).

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 208: See RCW 18.73.910.